California, session 20252026, SB1443.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33315 of the Education Code is amended to read:33315. (a) The Superintendent shall establish and implement a system of complaint processing, known as the Uniform Complaint Procedures, for educational programs specified in paragraph (1). The department shall review the regulations set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations pertaining to uniform complaint procedures and, on or before March 31, 2019, shall commence rulemaking proceedings to revise those regulations, as necessary, to conform to all of the following:(1) The Uniform Complaint Procedures shall apply to all of the following:(A) Adult education programs established pursuant to Sections 8500 to 8538, inclusive, and Sections 52500 to 52617, inclusive.(B) Consolidated categorical aid programs as listed in subdivision (a) of Section 64000.(C) Migrant child education established pursuant to Sections 54440 to 54445, inclusive.(D) Career technical and technical education and career technical and technical training programs established pursuant to Sections 52300 to 52462, inclusive.(E) Preschool programs established pursuant to Sections 8200 to 8490, inclusive.(F) The filing of complaints that allege unlawful discrimination, harassment, intimidation, or bullying against any protected group as identified under Sections 200 and 220 and Section 11135 of the Government Code, including any actual or perceived characteristic as set forth in Section 422.55 of the Penal Code, or on the basis of a person’s association with a person or group with one or more of these actual or perceived characteristics, in any program or activity conducted by an educational institution, as defined in Section 210.3, that is funded directly by, or that receives or benefits from, any state financial assistance.(G) Lactation accommodations pursuant to Section 222.(H) Educational rights of foster youth pursuant to Sections 48853, 48853.5, and 49069.5, and graduation requirements for foster youth, homeless youth, and other youth pursuant to Section 51225.1.(I) Pupil fees pursuant to Sections 49010 to 49013, inclusive.(J) Courses of study pursuant to Section 51228.3.(K) Instructional minutes for physical education pursuant to Section 51223.(L) Local control and accountability plans pursuant to Section 52075.(M) Juvenile court schools pursuant to Section 48645.7.(N) School safety plans pursuant to Section 32289.(O) Deficiencies related to preschool health and safety issues for a California state preschool program pursuant to Section 8212.(P) School or athletic team names, mascots, or nicknames pursuant to Section 221.3.(Q) Any other state or federal educational program the Superintendent deems appropriate.(2) As it pertains to child nutrition programs and established pursuant to Sections 49490 to 49570, inclusive, and special education programs established pursuant to Sections 56000 to 56865, inclusive, and Sections 59000 to 59300, inclusive, the Uniform Complaint Procedures shall expressly reference the federal provisions that govern complaints relative to these programs, as well as any additional applicable rules included within Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.(3) The department shall develop a pamphlet for parents that will explain the Uniform Complaint Procedures in a user-friendly manner and post this pamphlet on the department’s internet website.(4) Except for cases of complaints related to paragraph (2), a complainant who appeals a decision of a local educational agency under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations to the department shall receive a written appeal decision within 60 days of the department’s receipt of the appeal, unless extended by written agreement with the complainant or the department documents exceptional circumstances and informs the complainant.(5) Except for cases of complaints related to paragraph (2), for those complaints that are filed directly with the department under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and the department determines merit direct intervention, the department shall complete an investigation and provide a written decision to the complainant within 60 days of receipt of the complaint, unless the parties have agreed to extend the timeline or the department documents exceptional circumstances and informs the complainant.(6) If a local educational agency finds merit in a complaint, or the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal, filed under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, the local educational agency shall take corrective actions consistent with the requirements of existing law that will provide a remedy to the affected pupil, or, in the case of complaints related to subparagraphs (I), (J), (K), and (L) of paragraph (1), to all affected pupils, parents, and guardians. For corrective actions related to subparagraph (I), remedies shall, where applicable, include reasonable efforts by the public school to ensure full reimbursement.(7) Information regarding the requirements of this section shall be included in the annual notification distributed to pupils, parents and guardians, employees, and other interested parties pursuant to Section 4622 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.(b) The department may adopt emergency regulations pursuant to Section 11346.1 of the Government Code to satisfy the requirements of this section. The adoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.(c) Nothing in this section or those regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall prevent a local educational agency from using its local uniform complaint procedure to address complaints not listed in this section or those regulations.(d) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” has the same meaning as in Section 4600 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.SEC. 2. Section 35182.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:35182.5. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) State and federal laws require all schools participating in meal programs to provide nutritious food and beverages to pupils.(2) State and federal laws restrict the sale of food and beverages in competition with meal programs to enhance the nutritional goals for pupils, and to protect the fiscal and nutritional integrity of the school food service programs.(3) Parents, pupils, and community members should have the opportunity to ensure, through the review of food and beverage contracts, that food and beverages sold on school campuses provide nutritious sustenance to pupils, promote good health, help pupils learn, provide energy, and model fit living for life.(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Nonnutritious beverages” means any beverage that does not adhere to the definitions, restrictions, or requirements of Section 49430, 49430.7, or 49431.5, or Section 15576 or 15577 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.(2) “Nonnutritious food” means any food that is sold as a competitive food and does not adhere to the definitions, restrictions, or requirements of Section 49430, 49430.7, 49431, or 49431.2, or Section 15575, 15577, or 15578 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.(c) The governing board of a school district shall not do any of the following:(1) Enter into or renew a contract, or permit a school within the school district to enter into or renew a contract, that grants exclusive or nonexclusive advertising or grants the right to the exclusive or nonexclusive sale of nonnutritious beverages or nonnutritious food within the school district to a person, business, or corporation, unless the governing board of the school district does all of the following:(A) Adopts a policy after a public hearing of the governing board of the school district to ensure that the school district has internal controls in place to protect the integrity of the public funds and to ensure that funds raised benefit public education, and that the contracts are entered into on a competitive basis pursuant to procedures contained in Section 20111 of the Public Contract Code or through the issuance of a request for proposal.(B) Provides to parents, guardians, pupils, and members of the public the opportunity to comment on the contract by holding a public hearing on the contract during a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board of the school district. The governing board of the school district shall clearly, and in a manner recognizable to the general public, identify in the agenda the contract to be discussed at the meeting.(2) Enter into a contract that prohibits a school district employee from disparaging the goods or services of the party contracting with the governing board of the school district.(3) Enter into a contract or permit a school within the school district to enter into a contract for electronic products or services that requires the dissemination of advertising to pupils, unless the governing board of the school district does all of the following:(A) Enters into the contract at a noticed public hearing of the governing board of the school district.(B) Makes a finding that the electronic product or service in question is or would be an integral component of the education of pupils.(C) Makes a finding that the school district cannot afford to provide the electronic product or service unless it contracts to permit dissemination of advertising to pupils.(D) Provides written notice to the parents or guardians of pupils that the advertising will be used in the classroom or other learning centers. This notice shall be part of the school district’s normal ongoing communication to parents or guardians.(E) Offers the parents the opportunity to request in writing that the pupil not be exposed to the program that contains the advertising. A request shall be honored for the school year in which it is submitted, or longer if specified, but may be withdrawn by the parent or guardian at any time.(d) A governing board of the school district may meet the public hearing requirement set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) for those contracts that grant the right to the exclusive or nonexclusive sale of nonnutritious beverages or nonnutritious food within the school district, by an annual public hearing to review and discuss existing and potential contracts for the sale of food and beverages on campuses, including food and beverages sold as full meals, through competitive sales, as fundraisers, and through vending machines.(1) The public hearing shall include, but not be limited to, a discussion of all of the following:(A) The nutritional value of food and beverages sold within the school district.(B) The availability of fresh fruit, vegetables, and grains in school meals and snacks, including, but not limited to, locally grown and organic produce.(C) The amount of fat, sugar, and additives in the food and beverages discussed.(D) Barriers to pupil participation in school breakfast and lunch programs.(2) A school district that holds an annual public hearing consistent with this subdivision is not released from the public hearing requirements set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) for those contracts not discussed at the annual public hearing.(e) The governing board of the school district shall make accessible to the public a contract entered into pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) and shall not include in that contract a confidentiality clause that would prevent a school or school district from making any part of the contract public.(f) The governing board of a school district may sell advertising, products, or services on a nonexclusive basis.(g) The governing board of a school district may post public signs indicating the school district’s appreciation for the support of a person or business for the school district’s education program.(h) Contracts entered into before January 1, 2004, may remain in effect, but shall not be renewed if they are in conflict with this section.SEC. 3. Section 44252 of the Education Code is amended to read:44252. (a) (1) The commission shall establish standards and procedures for the initial issuance and renewal of credentials.(2) (A) The commission shall require an initial or renewal applicant who submits an initial or renewal application for the applicant’s credential online, as part of the application process, to read and attest by electronic signature a statement that the applicant for the credential understands the duties imposed on a holder of a teaching credential or a services credential pursuant to the Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code), including, but not limited to, the duty of a holder of a teaching credential or a services credential to report to any police department, sheriff’s department, county probation department authorized to receive reports, or county welfare department, whenever the credentialholder, in the credentialholder’s professional capacity or within the scope of the credentialholder’s employment, has knowledge of or observes a child whom the holder of a teaching credential or a services credential knows or reasonably suspects has been the victim of child abuse or neglect.(B) The commission shall require an initial applicant who submits an application in paper form, as part of the application process, to read and attest by signature a statement that the applicant understands the duties imposed on a holder of a teaching credential or a services credential pursuant to the Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code), including, but not limited to, the duty of a holder of a teaching credential or a services credential to report to any police department, sheriff’s department, county probation department authorized to receive reports, or county welfare department, whenever the credentialholder, in the credentialholder’s professional capacity or within the scope of the credentialholder’s employment, has knowledge of or observes a child whom the holder of a teaching credential or a services credential knows or reasonably suspects has been the victim of child abuse or neglect.(C) The statement described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall be substantially in the following form:“As a documentholder authorized to work with children, it is part of my professional and ethical duty to report every instance of child abuse or neglect known or suspected to have occurred to a child with whom I have professional contact.I understand that I must report immediately, or as soon as practicably possible, by telephone to a law enforcement agency or a child protective agency, and will send a written report and any evidence relating to the incident within 36 hours of becoming aware of the abuse or neglect of the child.I understand that reporting the information regarding a case of possible child abuse or neglect to an employer, supervisor, school principal, school counselor, coworker, or other person is not a substitute for making a mandated report to a law enforcement agency or a child protective agency.I understand that the reporting duties are individual and no supervisor or administrator may impede or inhibit my reporting duties.I understand that once I submit a report, I am not required to disclose my identity to my employer.I understand that my failure to report an instance of suspected child abuse or neglect as required by the Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act under Section 11166 of the Penal Code is a misdemeanor punishable by up to six months in jail or by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.I acknowledge and certify that as a documentholder, I will fulfill all the duties required of a mandated reporter.”(b) The commission shall not issue initially a credential, permit, certificate, or renewal of an emergency credential to a person to serve in the public schools unless the person has demonstrated proficiency in basic reading, writing, and mathematics skills in the English language as provided in Section 44252.5. The commission shall exempt the following persons from the basic skills proficiency test requirement:(1) A person credentialed solely for the purpose of teaching adults in an apprenticeship program.(2) An applicant for an adult education designated subject credential for other than an academic subject.(3) A person credentialed in another state who is an applicant for employment in a school district in this state who has passed a basic skills proficiency examination administered by the state where the person is credentialed.(4) A person credentialed in another state who is an applicant for employment in a school district in this state who has passed a basic skills proficiency examination that has been developed and administered by the school district offering that person employment, by cooperating school districts, or by the appropriate county office of education. School districts administering a basic skills proficiency examination under this paragraph shall comply with the requirements of subdivision (h) of Section 44830. The applicant shall be granted a nonrenewable credential, valid for not longer than one year, pending fulfillment of the basic skills proficiency requirement pursuant to Section 44252.5.(5) An applicant for a childcare center permit or a permit authorizing service in a development center for the handicapped if the holder of the permit is not required to have a baccalaureate degree.(6) The holder of a credential, permit, or certificate to teach, other than an emergency permit, who seeks an additional authorization to teach.(7) An applicant for a credential to provide service in the health profession.(8) An applicant who achieves scores on the writing, reading, and mathematics sections of the College Board SAT Reasoning Test, the enhanced ACT Test, or the California State University Early Assessment Program that are sufficient to waive the English placement test and the entry level mathematics examination administered by the California State University.(9) An applicant for an eminence credential to be issued pursuant to Section 44262.(10) (A) An applicant who earns at least a letter grade of B in qualifying coursework determined by a credential preparation program, or determined by the commission for an applicant not enrolled in a California credential preparation program, to sufficiently serve as an indicator of proficiency in basic reading, writing, and mathematics skills in the English language. As used in this section, “qualifying coursework” means a course or courses taken at a regionally accredited institution of higher education for academic credit that applies toward the requirements for an associate’s degree, baccalaureate degree, or higher degree. Qualifying coursework does not include professional development or continuing education units, inservice training or workshops, or courses where credits do not apply toward the requirements for an associate’s degree, baccalaureate degree, or higher degree.(B) (i) For purposes of subparagraph (A), the following courses are sufficient to serve as indicators of proficiency in basic reading, writing, and mathematics skills:(I) For reading proficiency, a course in the subjects of critical thinking, literature, philosophy, reading, rhetoric, or textual analysis.(II) For writing proficiency, a course in the subjects of composition, English, rhetoric, written communications, or writing.(III) For mathematics proficiency, a course in the subjects of algebra, geometry, mathematics, quantitative reasoning, or statistics.(ii) A course that does not fall within a subject described in clause (i) may serve as an alternative indicator of proficiency if the applicant provides documentation in writing from the registrar or relevant department chair of the regionally accredited institution of higher education where the course was taken that the course includes the study of subjects in reading, writing, or mathematics, as those terms are described in clause (i). A course that meets these standards may combine the study of reading and writing.(C) Qualifying coursework shall be a semester-length course of at least three units or a quarter-length course of at least four units.(11) A credential preparation program or the commission may determine that an applicant has demonstrated proficiency in basic reading, writing, and mathematics skills in the English language through a combination of qualifying coursework described in paragraph (10), passage of a component or components of the state basic skills proficiency test described in subdivision (d) of Section 44252.5, and scores described in paragraph (8).(12) An applicant who has obtained a baccalaureate degree or higher degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education.(c) (1) The Superintendent shall adopt an appropriate state test to measure proficiency in these basic skills. In adopting the test, the Superintendent shall seek assistance from the commission and an advisory board. A majority of the members of the advisory board shall be classroom teachers. The advisory board also shall include representatives of school boards, school administrators, parents, and postsecondary educational institutions.(2) The Superintendent shall adopt a normed test that the Superintendent determines will sufficiently test basic skills for purposes of this section.(3) The Superintendent, in conjunction with the commission and approved teacher training institutions, shall take steps necessary to ensure the effective implementation of this section.(d) This section does not require the holders of, or applicants for, a designated subjects special subjects credential to pass the state basic skills proficiency test unless the requirements for the specific credential required the possession of a baccalaureate degree. The governing board of a school district, the governing board of a consortium of school districts, or a governing board involved in a joint powers agreement that employs a holder of a designated subjects special subjects credential shall establish its own basic skills proficiency criteria for the holders of these credentials and shall arrange for those individuals to be assessed. The basic skills proficiency criteria established by the governing board shall be at least equivalent to the test required by the district, or in the case of a consortium or a joint powers agreement, by any of the participating districts, for graduation from high school. The governing board or boards may charge a fee to individuals being tested to cover the costs of the test, including the costs of developing, administering, and grading the test.(e) The commission shall compile data regarding the rate of passing the state basic skills proficiency test by persons who have been trained in various institutions of higher education. The data shall be available to members of the public, including to persons who intend to enroll in teacher education programs.(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that applicants for admission to teacher preparation programs not be denied admission on the basis of state basic skills proficiency test results.SEC. 4. Section 44259 of the Education Code is amended to read:44259. (a) Except as provided in clauses (i) and (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), a program of professional preparation for multiple or single subject teaching credentials shall not include more than two years of full-time study of professional preparation.(b) The minimum requirements for the preliminary multiple subject, single subject, or education specialist teaching credential are all of the following:(1) A baccalaureate degree or higher degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education. Except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 44227, for single subject teaching credentials, the baccalaureate degree shall not be in professional education. The commission shall encourage regionally accredited institutions of higher education to offer undergraduate minors in education and special education to students who intend to become single subject credentialed teachers.(2) [Reserved](3) (A) Satisfactory completion of a program of professional preparation that has been accredited by the Committee on Accreditation on the basis of standards of program quality and effectiveness that have been adopted by the commission. In accordance with the commission’s assessment and performance standards, a program shall include a teaching performance assessment as set forth in Section 44320.2 that is aligned with the California Standards for the Teaching Profession. The commission shall ensure that a candidate recommended for a credential or certificate has demonstrated satisfactory ability to assist pupils to meet or exceed academic content and performance standards for pupils adopted by the state board. Programs that meet this requirement for professional preparation shall include any of the following:(i) Integrated programs of subject matter preparation and professional preparation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 44259.1.(ii) Postbaccalaureate programs of professional preparation, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 44259.1.(iii) Internship programs of professional preparation, pursuant to Section 44321, Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 44325), Article 11 (commencing with Section 44380), and Article 3 (commencing with Section 44450) of Chapter 3.(iv) Degree programs offered pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 78060) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3.(B) A program of professional preparation pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall provide experience that addresses all of the following:(i) Health education, including a basic understanding of youth mental health, study of nutrition, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and the physiological and sociological effects of the abuse of alcohol, narcotics, and drugs and the use of tobacco. Training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation shall also meet the standards established by the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross.(ii) Field experience in methods of delivering appropriate educational services to pupils with exceptional needs in regular education programs.(iii) Advanced computer-based technology, including the uses of technology in educational settings.(4) Study of effective means of teaching literacy, including, but not limited to, the study of reading as described in subparagraphs (A) and (B), and evidence-based means of teaching foundational reading skills in print concepts, phonological awareness, phonics and word recognition, and fluency to all pupils, including tiered supports for pupils with reading difficulties, English learners, and pupils with exceptional needs. The study of effective means of teaching literacy shall be in accordance with the commission’s standards of program quality and effectiveness and current teaching performance expectations, shall be aligned to the current English Language Arts/English Language Development (ELA/ELD) Framework adopted by the state board, and shall incorporate the program guidelines for dyslexia developed pursuant to Section 56335. The study of reading shall meet the following requirements:(A) Commencing January 1, 1997, satisfactory completion of comprehensive reading instruction that is research based and includes all of the following:(i) The study of organized, systematic, explicit skills including phonemic awareness, direct, systematic, explicit phonics, and decoding skills.(ii) A strong literature, language, and comprehension component with a balance of oral and written language.(iii) Ongoing diagnostic techniques that inform teaching and assessment.(iv) Early intervention techniques.(v) Guided practice in a clinical setting.(B) For purposes of this section, “direct, systematic, explicit phonics” means phonemic awareness, spelling patterns, the direct instruction of sound/symbol codes and practice in connected text, and the relationship of direct, systematic, explicit phonics to the components set forth in clauses (i) to (v), inclusive, of subparagraph (A).(C) A program for the multiple subject teaching credential and the education specialist teaching credential also shall include the study of integrated methods of teaching language arts.(5) (A) Verification of subject matter competence, demonstrated through one of the following methods:(i) Completion of a subject matter program approved by the commission on the basis of standards of program quality and effectiveness pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 44310).(ii) Passage of a subject matter examination pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 44280).(iii) Successful completion of coursework at one or more regionally accredited institutions of higher education that addresses each of the domains of the subject matter requirements adopted by the commission in the content area of the credential pursuant to Section 44282, as verified by a commission-approved program of professional preparation. Coursework completed at a community or junior college that is regionally accredited by an accrediting agency listed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 44203 or by the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges of the Western Association of Schools and Colleges may count for purposes of this clause.(iv) Successful completion of a baccalaureate or higher degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education with the following, as applicable:(I) For single subject credentials, a major in one of the subject areas in which the commission credentials candidates.(II) For multiple subject credentials, a liberal studies major or other degree that includes coursework in the content areas pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44282.(III) For education specialist credentials, either a major in one of the subject areas in which the commission credentials candidates or a liberal studies or other major that includes coursework in the content areas pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44282.(v) Demonstration that the candidate, through a combination of the methods described in clauses (i), (ii), and (iii) in whole or in part, has met or exceeded each of the domains of the subject matter requirements adopted by the commission in the content area of the credential pursuant to Section 44282 for multiple and single subject credentials, or pursuant to Section 44265 for education specialist credentials.(B) (i) The commission shall ensure that subject matter standards and examinations are aligned with the academic content and performance standards for pupils adopted by the state board.(ii) The commission shall maintain the subject matter domains that include both broad content areas to support coursework review pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) and specific content elements to delineate subject matter examination specifications pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 44280).(6) Demonstration of a knowledge of the principles and provisions of the Constitution of the United States pursuant to Section 44335.(7) Demonstration, in accordance with the commission’s standards of program quality and effectiveness, of basic competency in the use of computers in the classroom as determined by one of the following:(A) Successful completion of a commission-approved program or course.(B) Successful passage of an assessment that is developed, approved, and administered by the commission.(c) The minimum requirements for the clear multiple subject, single subject, or education specialist teaching credential shall include all of the following requirements:(1) Possession of a valid preliminary teaching credential, as prescribed in subdivision (b), possession of a valid equivalent credential or certificate, or completion of equivalent requirements as determined by the commission.(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), completion of a program of beginning teacher induction, including either of the following:(A) A program of beginning teacher induction that is provided by one or more local educational agencies and has been approved by the commission on the basis of initial review and periodic evaluations of the program in relation to appropriate standards of credential program quality and effectiveness that have been adopted by the commission pursuant to this subdivision. The program standards shall encourage innovation and experimentation in the continuous preparation and induction of beginning teachers.(B) A program of beginning teacher induction that is sponsored by a regionally accredited institution of higher education in cooperation with one or more local school districts, that addresses the individual professional needs of beginning teachers and meets the commission’s standards of induction. The commission shall ensure that preparation and induction programs that qualify candidates for professional credentials extend and refine each beginning teacher’s professional skills in relation to the California Standards for the Teaching Profession and the academic content and performance standards for pupils adopted by the state board.(3) (A) If a candidate satisfies the requirements of subdivision (b) through completion of an accredited internship program of professional preparation, and if that internship program fulfills induction standards and is approved as set forth in this subdivision, the commission shall determine that the candidate has fulfilled the requirements of paragraph (2).(B) If an approved induction program is verified as unavailable to a beginning teacher, the commission shall accept completion of an approved clear credential program after completion of a baccalaureate degree at a regionally accredited institution of higher education as fulfilling the requirements of paragraph (2). The commission shall adopt regulations to implement this subparagraph.(d) The commission shall develop and implement standards of program quality and effectiveness that provide for the areas of application listed in clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), starting in professional preparation and continuing through induction.(e) A credential that was issued before January 1, 1993, shall remain in force as long as it is valid under the laws and regulations that were in effect on the date it was issued. The commission shall not, by regulation, invalidate an otherwise valid credential, unless it issues to the holder of the credential, in substitution, a new credential authorized by another provision in this chapter that is no more restrictive than the credential for which it was substituted with respect to the kind of service authorized and the grades, classes, or types of schools in which it authorizes service.(f) A credential program that is approved by the commission shall not deny an individual access to that program solely on the grounds that the individual obtained a teaching credential through completion of an internship program when that internship program has been accredited by the commission.(g) Notwithstanding this section, persons who were performing teaching services as of January 1, 1999, pursuant to the language of this section that was in effect before that date, may continue to perform those services without complying with any requirements that may be added by the amendments adding this subdivision.(h) Paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) does not apply to any person who, as of January 1, 1997, holds a multiple or single subject teaching credential, or to any person enrolled in a program of professional preparation for a multiple or single subject teaching credential as of January 1, 1997, who subsequently completes that program. It is the intent of the Legislature that the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) apply only to persons who enter a program of professional preparation on or after January 1, 1997.SEC. 5. Section 44325 of the Education Code is amended to read:44325. (a) The commission shall issue district intern credentials authorizing persons employed by a school district that maintains kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or that maintains classes in bilingual education to provide classroom instruction to pupils in those grades and classes in accordance with the requirements of Section 44830.3. The commission also shall issue district intern credentials authorizing persons employed by a school district to provide classroom instruction to pupils in special education classes, in accordance with the requirements of Section 44830.3.(b) Each district intern credential is valid for a period of two years. A credential may be valid for three years if the intern is participating in a program that leads to the attainment of a specialist credential in special education or four years if the intern is participating in a program that leads to the attainment of both a multiple subject or single subject teaching credential and a specialist credential in special education. Upon the recommendation of the commission-approved program sponsor, the commission may grant a one-year extension of the district intern credential.(c) The commission shall require each applicant for a district intern credential to demonstrate that the applicant meets all of the following minimum qualifications for that credential:(1) The possession of a baccalaureate degree conferred by a regionally accredited institution of higher education.(2) The successful passage of the state basic skills proficiency requirement pursuant to Sections 44252 and 44252.5.(3) The successful completion of the appropriate subject matter examination administered by the commission, or a commission-approved subject matter preparation program for the subject areas in which the district intern is authorized to teach.(4) The oral language component of the assessment program leading to the bilingual-crosscultural language and academic development certificate for persons seeking a district intern credential to teach bilingual education classes.(5) Verified employment in a teaching position at a school district, county office of education, or charter school in the state.(d) The commission shall apply the requirements of Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341 to each applicant for a district intern credential.SEC. 6. Section 44326 of the Education Code is amended to read:44326. (a) Persons holding district intern credentials issued by the commission under Section 44325 shall be authorized to teach the same services at the same levels authorized by the equivalent preliminary or clear credential in the subject area in which they have met the subject matter requirement.(b) Before being assigned to teach special education pupils, persons holding district intern credentials issued by the commission under Section 44325 to teach those pupils shall meet the requirements of subdivision (a).(c) Each district intern is required to teach with the assistance and guidance of certificated employees selected through a competitive process adopted by the governing board after consultation with the exclusive teacher representative unit or by personnel employed by institutions of higher education to supervise student teachers.(d) A certificated employee who assists the district intern shall possess valid certification at the same level or of the same type of credential as the district interns they serve.SEC. 7. Section 44468 of the Education Code is amended to read:44468. (a) An internship program, established pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 44325) of Chapter 2 or this article, that is accredited by the commission shall provide interns who meet entrance criteria and are enrolled in a multiple subject teaching credential program, a PK-3 early childhood education specialist credential program, a single subject teaching credential program, or an education specialist credential program that provides instruction to individuals with mild to moderate disabilities the opportunity to choose an early program completion option, culminating in a five-year preliminary teaching credential. The early program completion option shall be made available to interns seeking their initial preliminary credential who meet the following requirements:(1) Pass a written assessment that assesses knowledge of teaching foundations, is adopted for this purpose by the commission, and includes all of the following:(A) Human development as it relates to teaching and learning aligned with the state content and performance standards for pupils adopted by the state board.(B) Techniques to address learning differences including working with pupils with special needs.(C) Techniques to address working with English learners to provide access to the curriculum.(D) Reading instruction as set forth in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259.(E) The assessment of pupil progress based upon the state content and performance standards for pupils adopted by the state board and planning intervention based on the assessment.(F) Classroom management techniques.(G) Methods of teaching the subject fields.(2) (A) Pass the teaching performance assessment as set forth in Section 44320.2.(B) An intern participating in the early completion option may take the teaching performance assessment only one time as part of the early completion option. An intern who takes the teaching performance assessment but is not successful may complete the internship program. Scores on this assessment shall be used by the internship program in providing the individualized professional development plan for interns that emphasizes preparation in areas where additional growth is warranted and waiving preparation in areas where the candidate has demonstrated competence. The intern shall retake and pass the teaching performance assessment at the end of the internship in order to be considered for recommendation by the internship program to the commission.(3) Until the commission ensures that an approved teaching performance assessment for a preliminary multiple subject credential, for a preliminary PK-3 early childhood education specialist credential, and for a preliminary education specialist credential assesses candidates for competence in instruction in literacy, as specified in Sections 44320.2 and 44320.3, as applicable, successfully pass a reading instruction competence assessment required by Section 44283, if required for the intern’s credential.(4) Meet the requirements for teacher fitness as set forth in Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341.(b) An intern seeking their initial preliminary credential who elects to use the early completion option must first pass the assessment required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) in order to qualify to take the teaching performance assessment required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).(c) An intern seeking their initial preliminary credential who passes the assessments described in subdivision (a) and is recommended by the internship program to the commission is eligible for a five-year preliminary multiple subject teaching credential, single subject teaching credential, PK-3 early childhood education specialist credential, or education specialist credential that authorizes instruction to individuals with mild to moderate disabilities.(d) The commission shall issue a clear multiple subject teaching credential, a clear PK-3 early childhood education specialist credential, a clear education specialist credential, or single subject teaching credential to an applicant whose employing school district documents, in a manner prescribed by the commission, that the applicant has fulfilled both of the following requirements:(1) Holds a preliminary five-year teaching credential issued by the commission.(2) Completes a commission-approved teacher induction program.SEC. 8.Section 49414.7 of the Education Code is amended to read:49414.7.(a)A local educational agency may provide emergency stock albuterol inhalers, including, if necessary, single-use disposable holding chambers, to school nurses or trained personnel who have volunteered pursuant to subdivision (d), and school nurses or trained personnel may use an emergency stock albuterol inhaler to provide emergency medical aid to persons suffering, or reasonably believed to be suffering, from respiratory distress.(b)For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1)“Albuterol” means a bronchodilator used to open the airways by relaxing the muscles around the bronchial tubes.(2)“Authorizing physician and surgeon” may include, but is not limited to, a physician and surgeon employed by, or contracting with, a local educational agency, a medical director of the local health department, or a local emergency medical services director.(3)“Inhaler” means a device used for the delivery of prescribed asthma medication that is inhaled.(4)“Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.(5)“Metered-dose inhaler (MDI)” means a pressurized sprayer that delivers a measured amount of a medication.(6)“Qualified supervisor of health” may include, but is not limited to, a school nurse.(7)“Respiratory distress” means the sudden appearance of signs and symptoms of difficulty breathing. Signs and symptoms of respiratory distress may include one or more of the following:(A)Complaints of a tight chest or chest pain.(B)Wheezing or noisy breathing.(C)Persistent coughing.(D)Difficulty breathing.(E)Appears to be in distress.(F)Lips or fingernails turning blue.(G)Shortness of breath.(8)“Stock albuterol inhaler” means albuterol medication in the form of an MDI that is ordered by a health care provider and is not prescribed for a specific person and also includes, if necessary, a single-use disposable holding chamber.(9)“Volunteer” or “trained personnel” means an employee who has volunteered to administer stock albuterol inhalers to a person if the person is suffering, or reasonably believed to be suffering, from respiratory distress, has been designated by a school, and has received training pursuant to subdivision (d).(c)Each private school in the state may voluntarily determine whether or not to make emergency stock albuterol inhalers and trained personnel available at its school. In making this determination, a school shall evaluate the emergency medical response time to the school and determine whether initiating emergency medical services is an acceptable alternative to stock albuterol inhalers and trained personnel. A private school choosing to exercise the authority provided under this subdivision shall not receive state funds specifically for purposes of this subdivision.(d)(1)Each local educational agency and private school in the state may designate one or more volunteers to receive initial and annual refresher training, based on the standards developed pursuant to subdivision (e), regarding the storage and emergency use of a stock albuterol inhaler from the school nurse or other qualified person designated by an authorizing physician and surgeon.(2)Schools are encouraged and recommended to have a minimum of two trained school employees.(e)(1)The Superintendent shall establish, and post on the department’s internet website, minimum standards of training for the administration of stock albuterol inhalers that satisfies the requirements of paragraph (2). Every five years, or sooner as deemed necessary by the Superintendent, the Superintendent shall review minimum standards of training for the administration of stock albuterol inhalers that satisfy the requirements of paragraph (2). For purposes of this subdivision, the Superintendent shall consult with organizations and providers with expertise in administering stock albuterol inhalers and administering medication in a school environment, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Public Health, the Emergency Medical Services Authority, the American Academy of Allergy, Asthma and Immunology, the California School Nurses Organization, the California Medical Association, the American Academy of Pediatrics, the California Society of Allergy, Asthma and Immunology, the American College of Allergy, Asthma and Immunology, and others.(2)Training established pursuant to this subdivision shall include all of the following:(A)Techniques for recognizing symptoms of respiratory distress.(B)Standards and procedures for the storage, restocking, and emergency use of stock albuterol inhalers.(C)Emergency followup procedures, including calling the emergency 911 telephone number and contacting, if possible, the pupil’s parent or guardian and physician.(D)Recommendations on the necessity of instruction and certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation.(E)Written materials covering the information required under this subdivision.(3)Training established pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with the most recent guidelines for medication administration issued by the department.(4)Training established pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to a volunteer during the volunteer’s regular working hours and at no cost to the volunteer.(5)A school shall retain for reference the written materials prepared under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2).(f)Any local educational agency electing to use stock albuterol inhalers for emergency aid shall distribute a notice at least once per school year to all staff that contains the following information:(1)A description of the volunteer request stating that the request is for volunteers to be trained to administer a stock albuterol inhaler to a person if the person is suffering, or reasonably believed to be suffering, from respiratory distress, as specified in subdivision (b).(2)A description of the training that the volunteer will receive pursuant to subdivision (d).(g)(1)A qualified supervisor of health at a local educational agency electing to use stock albuterol inhalers for emergency aid shall obtain from an authorizing physician and surgeon a prescription for each school for stock albuterol inhalers. A qualified supervisor of health at a local educational agency shall be responsible for stocking the stock albuterol inhalers and restocking it if it is used.(2)If a local educational agency does not have a qualified supervisor of health, an administrator at the local educational agency shall carry out the duties specified in paragraph (1).(3)A prescription pursuant to this subdivision may be filled by local or mail-order pharmacies or stock albuterol inhaler manufacturers.(4)An authorizing physician and surgeon shall not be subject to professional review, be liable in a civil action, or be subject to criminal prosecution for the issuance of a prescription or order pursuant to this section, unless the physician and surgeon’s issuance of the prescription or order constitutes gross negligence or willful or malicious conduct.(h)A school nurse or, if the school does not have a school nurse or the school nurse is not onsite or available, a volunteer may administer a stock albuterol inhaler to a person exhibiting potentially life-threatening symptoms of respiratory distress at school or a school activity when a physician is not immediately available. If the stock albuterol inhaler is used, it shall be restocked as soon as reasonably possible, but no later than two weeks after it is used. Stock albuterol inhalers shall be restocked before their expiration date.(i)A volunteer shall initiate emergency medical services or other appropriate medical followup in accordance with the training materials retained pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (e).(j)(1)A local educational agency electing to use stock albuterol inhalers for emergency aid shall not be liable for any civil damages resulting from any act or omission, other than an act or omission constituting gross negligence or willful and wanton misconduct, in the emergency administration of an albuterol inhaler by any of its school nurses or trained volunteers who have volunteered pursuant to subdivision (d).(2)An employee who volunteers under this section shall be provided defense and indemnification by the local educational agency for any and all civil liability, in accordance with, but not limited to, that provided in Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code. This information shall be reduced to writing, provided to the volunteer, and retained in the volunteer’s personnel file.(k)A state agency, the department, or a public school may accept gifts, grants, and donations from any source for the support of the public school carrying out the provisions of this section, including, but not limited to, the acceptance of stock albuterol inhalers from a manufacturer or wholesaler.SEC. 9.SEC. 8. Section 66060 of the Education Code is amended to read:66060. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, postsecondary educational institutions may establish and maintain childcare and development programs or California state preschool programs on or near their respective campuses.(2) (A) Postsecondary educational institutions under contract with the department for California state preschool program services pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 are subject to the rules and regulations adopted by the Superintendent.(B) Postsecondary education institutions under contract with the State Department of Social Services for childcare and development program services pursuant to this chapter or Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 10200) and Part 1.8 (commencing with Section 10207) of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code are subject to the rules and regulations adopted by the State Department of Social Services.(b) Children of students of each campus operating a child development program or California state preschool program shall have first priority for service in that program, in accordance with the priorities established in Sections 8210 and 8211 of this code and in subdivision (b) of Section 10271 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(c) The postsecondary educational institutions may institutionalize child development programs of California state preschool programs on their respective campuses for the purpose of incorporating child development programs or California state preschool programs into the missions and functions of the respective campuses.(d) (1) The Superintendent, in cooperation with postsecondary educational institutions, shall establish rules and regulations governing programs operated pursuant to this section.(2) The State Department of Social Services, in cooperation with postsecondary educational institutions, shall establish rules and regulations governing childcare and development programs pursuant to this chapter and Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 10200) and Part 1.8 (commencing with Section 10207) of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that a consortium composed of postsecondary educational institutions be established by the institutions to improve communication and cooperation and to advise and assist the Superintendent and the State Department of Social Services in the development of rules and regulations and policies and procedures affecting California state preschool programs and childcare and development programs. The Superintendent and the State Department of Social Services, in cooperation with the consortium, shall be responsible for ongoing communication with and dissemination of information to all campus childcare and development agencies and California state preschool programs under contract with the department or the State Department of Social Services.SEC. 10.SEC. 9. Section 66061 of the Education Code is amended to read:66061. A child development program or California state preschool program, as defined in subdivision (w) of Section 8205, established by the California Community Colleges, the California State University, or the University of California pursuant to Section 66060 is encouraged to give priority to children of single-parent students who meet income criteria established by the institution.SEC. 11.SEC. 10. Section 20118.4 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read:20118.4. (a) If any change or alteration of a contract governed by Article 3 (commencing with Section 17595) of Chapter 5 of Part 10.5 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code is ordered by the governing board of the district, the change or alteration shall be specified in writing and the cost agreed upon between the governing board and the contractor. The board may authorize the contractor to proceed with performance of the change or alteration, without the formality of securing bids, if the cost so agreed upon does not exceed the greater of the following:(1) The amount specified in Section 20111 or 20114, whichever is applicable to the original contract.(2) Ten percent of the original contract price.(b) The governing board of any school district, or of two or more school districts governed by governing boards of identical personnel, having an average daily attendance of 250,000 or more as shown by the annual report of the county superintendent of schools for the preceding year, may also authorize any change or alteration of a contract for reconstruction or rehabilitation work, other than for the construction of new buildings or other new structures, if the cost of the change or alteration is in excess of the limitations in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) but does not exceed 25 percent of the original contract price, without the formality of securing bids, and the change or alteration is a necessary and integral part of the work under the contract and the taking of bids would delay the completion of the contract. Changes exceeding 15 percent of the original contract price shall be approved by an affirmative vote of not less than 75 percent of the members of the governing board.